Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.150

Receipt of property or money from United States attorney general—Use, expenditure—Deposit.

(1) Each state agency is authorized to receive property or money made available by the attorney general of the United States under section 881(e) of Title 21 of the United States Code and, except as required to the contrary under subsection (2) of this section, to use the property or spend the money for such purposes as are permitted under both federal law and the state law specifying the powers and duties of the agency.

(2) Unless precluded by federal law, all funds received by a state agency under section 881(e) of Title 21 of the United States Code shall be promptly deposited into the state general fund.

[ 2009 c 479 s 27; 1986 c 246 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 479: See note following RCW 2.56.030.